Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-254
Mobile barber shop license; change of ownership or mobile unit; effect.

Each mobile barber shop license issued shall be in effect solely for the owner or owners and the mobile unit named thereon and shall expire automatically upon any change of ownership or mobile unit. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such barber shop may reopen for business.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 89.